New Jersey, session 221, A5402.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  A person is guilty of a crime if the person impersonates a first responder, assumes a false identity as a first responder, or makes a false or misleading statement regarding their own identity as a first responder for the purpose of committing a crime or offense and commits a crime or offense in such an assumed character or false identity. b.  An offense under subsection a. constitutes a crime of the fourth degree if the underlying offense is a disorderly persons offense or a petty disorderly persons offense. Otherwise, a crime under subsection a. is a crime one degree higher than the most serious underlying crime, except that where the underlying crime is a crime of the first degree, the crime is a first-degree crime. First responder means a law enforcement officer, paid or volunteer firefighter, paid or volunteer member of a duly incorporated first aid, emergency, ambulance, or rescue squad association, or any other individual who, in the course of his employment, is dispatched to the scene of a motor vehicle accident or other emergency situation for the purpose of providing medical care or other assistance. 2. This act shall take effect immediately.